Massachusetts, session 194th, S1743.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 164 of Chapter 6 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by striking out the words “A full-call fire department;” and inserting in place
thereof the following words:- “An at large fire department;”.
of 1